Illinois, session 104th, HB5795.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Labor Relations Act is 5amended by changing Section 6 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 315/6)  (from Ch. 48, par. 1606)7    Sec. 6. Right to organize and bargain collectively; 8exclusive representation; and fair share arrangements. 9    (a) Employees of the State and any political subdivision 10of the State, excluding employees of the General Assembly of 11the State of Illinois and employees excluded from the 12definition of "public employee" under subsection (n) of 13Section 3 of this Act, have, and are protected in the exercise 14of, the right of self-organization, and may form, join or 15assist any labor organization, to bargain collectively through 16representatives of their own choosing on questions of wages, 17hours and other conditions of employment, not excluded by 18Section 4 of this Act, and to engage in other concerted 19activities not otherwise prohibited by law for the purposes of 20collective bargaining or other mutual aid or protection, free 21from interference, restraint or coercion. Employees also have, 22and are protected in the exercise of, the right to refrain from 23participating in any such concerted activities. Employees may   HB5795- 2 -LRB104 22175 BDA 38427 b1be required, pursuant to the terms of a lawful fair share 2agreement, to pay a fee which shall be their proportionate 3share of the costs of the collective bargaining process, 4contract administration and pursuing matters affecting wages, 5hours and other conditions of employment as defined in Section 63(g). At the request of any labor organization or public 7employer, bargaining sessions shall be open to the public for 8viewing. 9    (b) Nothing in this Act prevents an employee from 10presenting a grievance to the employer and having the 11grievance heard and settled without the intervention of an 12employee organization; provided that the exclusive bargaining 13representative is afforded the opportunity to be present at 14such conference and that any settlement made shall not be 15inconsistent with the terms of any agreement in effect between 16the employer and the exclusive bargaining representative.17    (c) A labor organization designated by the Board as the 18representative of the majority of public employees in an 19appropriate unit in accordance with the procedures herein or 20recognized by a public employer as the representative of the 21majority of public employees in an appropriate unit is the 22exclusive representative for the employees of such unit for 23the purpose of collective bargaining with respect to rates of 24pay, wages, hours and other conditions of employment not 25excluded by Section 4 of this Act. Unless otherwise mutually 26agreed, a public employer is required at least once each month   HB5795- 3 -LRB104 22175 BDA 38427 b1and upon request, to furnish the exclusive bargaining 2representative with a complete list of the names and addresses 3of the public employees in the bargaining unit, provided that 4a public employer shall not be required to furnish such a list 5more than once per payroll period. The exclusive bargaining 6representative shall use the list exclusively for bargaining 7representation purposes and shall not disclose any information 8contained in the list for any other purpose. Nothing in this 9Section, however, shall prohibit a bargaining representative 10from disseminating a list of its union members. 11    At the time the public employer provides such list, it 12shall also provide to the exclusive representative, in an 13Excel file or other mutually agreed upon editable digital file 14format, the employee's job title, worksite location, work 15telephone numbers, identification number if available, and any 16home and personal cellular telephone numbers on file with the 17employer, date of hire, work email address, and any personal 18email address on file with the employer. In addition, unless 19otherwise mutually agreed, within 10 calendar days from the 20date of hire of a bargaining unit employee, the public 21employer shall provide to the exclusive representative, in an 22electronic file or other mutually agreed upon format, the 23following information about the new employee: the employee's 24name, job title, worksite location, home address, work 25telephone numbers, and any home and personal cellular 26telephone numbers on file with the employer, date of hire,   HB5795- 4 -LRB104 22175 BDA 38427 b1work email address, and any personal email address on file 2with the employer. 3    (c-5) No employer shall disclose the following information 4of any employee: (1) the employee's home address (including 5ZIP code and county); (2) the employee's date of birth; (3) the 6employee's home and personal phone number; (4) the employee's 7personal email address; (5) any information personally 8identifying employee membership or membership status in a 9labor organization or other voluntary association affiliated 10with a labor organization or a labor federation (including 11whether employees are members of such organization, the 12identity of such organization, whether or not employees pay or 13authorize the payment of any dues or moneys to such 14organization, and the amounts of such dues or moneys); and (6) 15emails or other communications between a labor organization 16and its members. 17    As soon as practicable after receiving a request for any 18information prohibited from disclosure under this subsection 19(c-5), excluding a request from the exclusive bargaining 20representative of the employee, the employer must provide a 21written copy of the request, or a written summary of any oral 22request, to the exclusive bargaining representative of the 23employee or, if no such representative exists, to the 24employee. The employer must also provide a copy of any 25response it has made within 5 business days of sending the 26response to any request.   HB5795- 5 -LRB104 22175 BDA 38427 b1    If an employer discloses information in violation of this 2subsection (c-5), an aggrieved employee of the employer or his 3or her exclusive bargaining representative may file an unfair 4labor practice charge with the Illinois Labor Relations Board 5pursuant to Section 10 of this Act or commence an action in the 6circuit court to enforce the provisions of this Act, including 7actions to compel compliance, if an employer willfully and 8wantonly discloses information in violation of this 9subsection. The circuit court for the county in which the 10complainant resides, in which the complainant is employed, or 11in which the employer is located shall have jurisdiction in 12this matter. 13    This subsection does not apply to disclosures (i) required 14under the Freedom of Information Act, (ii) for purposes of 15conducting public operations or business, or (iii) to the 16exclusive representative. 17    (c-10) Employers shall provide to exclusive 18representatives, including their agents and employees, 19reasonable access to employees in the bargaining units they 20represent. This access shall at all times be conducted in a 21manner so as not to impede normal operations.22        (1) Access includes the following:23            (A) the right to meet with one or more employees on 24        the employer's premises during the work day to 25        investigate and discuss grievances and 26        workplace-related complaints without charge to pay or   HB5795- 6 -LRB104 22175 BDA 38427 b1        leave time of employees or agents of the exclusive 2        representative;3            (B) the right to conduct worksite meetings during 4        lunch and other non-work breaks, and before and after 5        the workday, on the employer's premises to discuss 6        collective bargaining negotiations, the administration 7        of collective bargaining agreements, other matters 8        related to the duties of the exclusive representative, 9        and internal matters involving the governance or 10        business of the exclusive representative, without 11        charge to pay or leave time of employees or agents of 12        the exclusive representative;13            (C) the right to meet with newly hired employees, 14        without charge to pay or leave time of the employees or 15        agents of the exclusive representative, on the 16        employer's premises or at a location mutually agreed 17        to by the employer and exclusive representative for up 18        to one hour either within the first two weeks of 19        employment in the bargaining unit or at a later date 20        and time if mutually agreed upon by the employer and 21        the exclusive representative; and22            (D) the right to use the facility mailboxes and 23        bulletin boards of the employer to communicate with 24        bargaining unit employees regarding collective 25        bargaining negotiations, the administration of the 26        collective bargaining agreements, the investigation of   HB5795- 7 -LRB104 22175 BDA 38427 b1        grievances, other workplace-related complaints and 2        issues, and internal matters involving the governance 3        or business of the exclusive representative.4        (2) Nothing in this Section shall prohibit an employer 5    and exclusive representative from agreeing in a collective 6    bargaining agreement to provide the exclusive 7    representative greater access to bargaining unit 8    employees, including through the use of the employer's 9    email system. 10    (d) Labor organizations recognized by a public employer as 11the exclusive representative or so designated in accordance 12with the provisions of this Act are responsible for 13representing the interests of all public employees in the 14unit. Nothing herein shall be construed to limit an exclusive 15representative's right to exercise its discretion to refuse to 16process grievances of employees that are unmeritorious.17    (e) When a collective bargaining agreement is entered into 18with an exclusive representative, it may include in the 19agreement a provision requiring employees covered by the 20agreement who are not members of the organization to pay their 21proportionate share of the costs of the collective bargaining 22process, contract administration and pursuing matters 23affecting wages, hours and conditions of employment, as 24defined in Section 3 (g), but not to exceed the amount of dues 25uniformly required of members. The organization shall certify 26to the employer the amount constituting each nonmember   HB5795- 8 -LRB104 22175 BDA 38427 b1employee's proportionate share which shall not exceed dues 2uniformly required of members. In such case, the proportionate 3share payment in this Section shall be deducted by the 4employer from the earnings of the nonmember employees and paid 5to the employee organization.6    (f) Employers shall make payroll deductions of labor 7organization dues, initiation fees, assessments, and other 8payments for a labor organization that is the exclusive 9representative. Such deductions shall be made in accordance 10with the terms of an employee's written authorization, and 11shall be paid to the exclusive representative. Written 12authorization may be evidenced by electronic communications, 13and such writing or communication may be evidenced by the 14electronic signature of the employee as provided under Section 155-120 of the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act. 16    There is no impediment to an employee's right to resign 17union membership at any time. However, notwithstanding any 18other provision of law to the contrary regarding authorization 19and deduction of dues or other payments to a labor 20organization, the exclusive representative and a public 21employee may agree to reasonable limits on the right of the 22employee to revoke such authorization, including a period of 23irrevocability that exceeds one year. An authorization that is 24irrevocable for one year, which may be automatically renewed 25for successive annual periods in accordance with the terms of 26the authorization, and that contains at least an annual 10-day   HB5795- 9 -LRB104 22175 BDA 38427 b1period of time during which the employee may revoke the 2authorization, shall be deemed reasonable.3    This Section shall apply to all claims that allege that a 4labor organization or a public employer has improperly 5deducted or collected dues from an employee without regard to 6whether the claims or the facts upon which they are based 7occurred before, on, or after the effective date of this 8amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly and shall apply 9retroactively to the maximum extent permitted by law. 10    (f-5) Where a collective bargaining agreement is 11terminated, or continues in effect beyond its scheduled 12expiration date pending the negotiation of a successor 13agreement or the resolution of an impasse under Section 14, 14the employer shall continue to honor and abide by any dues 15deduction or fair share clause contained therein until a new 16agreement is reached including dues deduction or a fair share 17clause. For the benefit of any successor exclusive 18representative certified under this Act, this provision shall 19be applicable, provided the successor exclusive 20representative:21        (i) certifies to the employer the amount constituting 22    each non-member's proportionate share under subsection 23    (e); or24        (ii) presents the employer with employee written 25    authorizations for the deduction of dues, assessments, and 26    fees under this subsection.  HB5795- 10 -LRB104 22175 BDA 38427 b1    Failure to so honor and abide by dues deduction or fair 2share clauses for the benefit of any exclusive representative, 3including a successor, shall be a violation of the duty to 4bargain and an unfair labor practice. 5    (f-10) Upon receiving written notice of authorization, the 6public employer must commence dues deductions as soon as 7practicable, but in no case later than 30 days after receiving 8notice from the labor organization. Employee deductions shall 9be transmitted to the labor organization no later than 30 days 10after they are deducted unless a shorter period is mutually 11agreed to.12    (f-15) Deductions shall remain in effect until:13        (1) the public employer receives notice that a public 14    employee has revoked their authorization in writing in 15    accordance with the terms of the authorization; or16        (2) the individual employee is no longer employed by 17    the public employer in a bargaining unit position 18    represented by the same exclusive representative, provided 19    that if the employee is, within a period of one year, 20    employed by the same public employer in a position 21    represented by the same labor organization, the right to 22    dues deduction shall be automatically reinstated.23    Nothing in this subsection prevents an employee from 24continuing to authorize payroll deductions when no longer 25represented by the exclusive representative that would receive 26such deduction.   HB5795- 11 -LRB104 22175 BDA 38427 b1    Should the individual employee who has signed a dues 2deduction authorization card either be removed from a public 3employer's payroll or otherwise placed on any type of 4involuntary or voluntary leave of absence, whether paid or 5unpaid, the public employee's dues deduction shall be 6continued upon that public employee's return to the payroll in 7a bargaining unit position represented by the same exclusive 8representative or restoration to active duty from such a leave 9of absence.10    (f-20) Unless otherwise mutually agreed by the public 11employer and the exclusive representative, employee requests 12to authorize, revoke, cancel, or change authorizations for 13payroll deductions for labor organizations shall be directed 14to the labor organization rather than to the public employer. 15The labor organization shall be responsible for initially 16processing and notifying the public employer of proper 17requests or providing proper requests to the employer. If the 18requests are not provided to the public employer, the employer 19shall rely on information provided by the labor organization 20regarding whether deductions for a labor organization were 21properly authorized, revoked, canceled, or changed, and the 22labor organization shall indemnify the public employer for any 23damages and reasonable costs incurred for any claims made by 24employees for deductions made in good faith reliance on that 25information.26    (f-25) Upon receipt by the exclusive representative of an   HB5795- 12 -LRB104 22175 BDA 38427 b1appropriate written authorization from an employee, written 2notice of authorization shall be provided to the employer and 3any authorized deductions shall be made in accordance with 4law. The labor organization shall indemnify the public 5employer for any damages and reasonable costs incurred for any 6claims made by employees for deductions made in good faith 7reliance on its notification.8    (f-30) The failure of an employer to comply with the 9provisions of this Section shall be a violation of the duty to 10bargain and an unfair labor practice. Relief for the violation 11shall be reimbursement by the public employer of dues that 12should have been deducted or paid based on a valid 13authorization given by the employee or employees. In addition, 14the provisions of a collective bargaining agreement that 15contain the obligations set forth in this Section may be 16enforced in accordance with Sections 8 and 16.17    (f-35) The Illinois Labor Relations Board shall have 18exclusive jurisdiction over claims under Illinois law that 19allege that a labor organization has unlawfully collected dues 20from a public employee in violation of this Act. The Board 21shall by rule require that in cases in which a public employee 22alleges that a labor organization has unlawfully collected 23dues, the public employer shall continue to deduct the 24employee's dues from the employee's pay, but shall transmit 25the dues to the Board for deposit in an escrow account 26maintained by the Board. If the exclusive representative   HB5795- 13 -LRB104 22175 BDA 38427 b1maintains an escrow account for the purpose of holding dues to 2which an employee has objected, the employer shall transmit 3the entire amount of dues to the exclusive representative, and 4the exclusive representative shall hold in escrow the dues 5that the employer would otherwise have been required to 6transmit to the Board for escrow; provided that the escrow 7account maintained by the exclusive representative complies 8with rules adopted by the Board or that the collective 9bargaining agreement requiring the payment of the dues 10contains an indemnification provision for the purpose of 11indemnifying the employer with respect to the employer's 12transmission of dues to the exclusive representative.13    (f-40) If any clause, sentence, paragraph, or subparagraph 14of this Section shall be adjudged by a court of competent 15jurisdiction to be unconstitutional or otherwise invalid, that 16judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder 17thereof, but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, 18sentence, paragraph, or subparagraph of this Section directly 19involved in the controversy in which that judgment shall have 20been rendered.21    If any clause, sentence, paragraph, or part of a signed 22authorization for payroll deductions shall be adjudged by a 23court of competent jurisdiction to be unconstitutional or 24otherwise invalid, that judgment shall not affect, impair, or 25invalidate the remainder of the signed authorization, but 26shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence,   HB5795- 14 -LRB104 22175 BDA 38427 b1paragraph, or part of the signed authorization directly 2involved in the controversy in which that judgment shall have 3been rendered. 4    (g) Agreements containing a fair share agreement must 5safeguard the right of nonassociation of employees based upon 6bona fide religious tenets or teachings of a church or 7religious body of which such employees are members. Such 8employees may be required to pay an amount equal to their fair 9share, determined under a lawful fair share agreement, to a 10nonreligious charitable organization mutually agreed upon by 11the employees affected and the exclusive bargaining 12representative to which such employees would otherwise pay 13such service fee. If the affected employees and the bargaining 14representative are unable to reach an agreement on the matter, 15the Board may establish an approved list of charitable 16organizations to which such payments may be made.17(Source: P.A. 101-620, eff. 12-20-19; 102-38, eff. 6-25-21.)